Massachusetts, session 194th, H2511.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 46 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 15 after the word “women,” the
following:- "the last four numbers of the".
of 1